Missouri, session 2026, SB1066.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 137.016, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 137.016,
to read as follows:
137.016. 1. As used in Section 4(b) of Article X of
the Missouri Constitution, the following terms mean:
(1) "Residential property"[,]:
(a) All real property improved by a structure which is
used or intended to be used for residential living by human
occupants[,];
(b) Vacant land in connection with an airport[,];
(c) Land used as a golf course[,];
(d) Manufactured home parks[,];
(e) Bed and breakfast inns in which the owner resides
and uses as a primary residence with six or fewer rooms for
rent[, and];
(f) Time-share units as defined in section 407.600,
except to the extent such units are actually rented and
subject to sales tax under subdivision (6) of subsection 1
of section 144.020[, but]; and
(g) Any single family home owned by an individual or
business that is leased for a term of less than thirty
consecutive days, in whole or in part, subject to sales tax


under subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of section 144.020,
provided that the provisions of this paragraph may not apply
to such properties in excess of fifteen such properties
owned by the same individual or business. For the purposes
of this paragraph, the term "business" shall mean a sole
proprietor, partnership, or limited liability company. For
the purposes of this paragraph for determining the number of
single family homes leased for a term of less than thirty
consecutive days, in whole or in part, subject to sales tax
under subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of section 144.020
owned by an individual or business, all single family homes
that are such properties owned by the individual or
business, or which an individual or business is a part,
shall be counted;
Residential property shall not include other similar
facilities used primarily for transient housing. For the
purposes of this section, "transient housing" means all
rooms available for rent or lease for which the receipts
from the rent or lease of such rooms are subject to state
sales tax pursuant to subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of
section 144.020; the leasing of a single family home, in
whole or in part, for a term of less than thirty consecutive
days does not, in itself, constitute "transient housing";
(2) "Agricultural and horticultural property", all
real property used for agricultural purposes and devoted
primarily to the raising and harvesting of crops; to the
feeding, breeding and management of livestock which shall
include breeding, showing, and boarding of horses; to
dairying, or to any other combination thereof; and buildings
and structures customarily associated with farming,
agricultural, and horticultural uses. Agricultural and
horticultural property shall also include land devoted to


and qualifying for payments or other compensation under a
soil conservation or agricultural assistance program under
an agreement with an agency of the federal government.
Agricultural and horticultural property shall further
include any reliever airport. Real property classified as
forest croplands shall not be agricultural or horticultural
property so long as it is classified as forest croplands and
shall be taxed in accordance with the laws enacted to
implement Section 7 of Article X of the Missouri
Constitution. Agricultural and horticultural property shall
also include any sawmill or planing mill defined in the U.S.
Department of Labor's Standard Industrial Classification
(SIC) Manual under Industry Group 242 with the SIC number
2421. Agricultural and horticultural property shall also
include urban and community gardens. For the purposes of
this section, "urban and community gardens" shall include
real property cultivated by residents of a neighborhood or
community for the purposes of providing agricultural
products, as defined in section 262.900, for the use of
residents of the neighborhood or community, and shall not
include a garden intended for individual or personal use;
(3) "Utility, industrial, commercial, railroad and
other real property", all real property used directly or
indirectly for any commercial, mining, industrial,
manufacturing, trade, professional, business, or similar
purpose, including all property centrally assessed by the
state tax commission but shall not include floating docks,
portions of which are separately owned and the remainder of
which is designated for common ownership and in which no one
person or business entity owns more than five individual
units. All other real property not included in the property
listed in subclasses (1) and (2) of Section 4(b) of Article
X of the Missouri Constitution, as such property is defined


in this section, shall be deemed to be included in the term
"utility, industrial, commercial, railroad and other real
property".
2. Pursuant to Article X of the state Constitution,
any taxing district may adjust its operating levy to recoup
any loss of property tax revenue, except revenues from the
surtax imposed pursuant to Article X, Subsection 2 of
Section 6 of the Constitution, as the result of changing the
classification of structures intended to be used for
residential living by human occupants which contain five or
more dwelling units if such adjustment of the levy does not
exceed the highest tax rate in effect subsequent to the 1980
tax year. For purposes of this section, loss in revenue
shall include the difference between the revenue that would
have been collected on such property under its
100 classification prior to enactment of this section and the
101 amount to be collected under its classification under this
102 section. The county assessor of each county or city not
103 within a county shall provide information to each taxing
104 district within its boundaries regarding the difference in
105 assessed valuation of such property as the result of such
106 change in classification.
107 3. All reclassification of property as the result of
108 changing the classification of structures intended to be
109 used for residential living by human occupants which contain
110 five or more dwelling units shall apply to assessments made
111 after December 31, 1994.
112 4. Where real property is used or held for use for
113 more than one purpose and such uses result in different
114 classifications, the county assessor shall allocate to each
115 classification the percentage of the true value in money of
116 the property devoted to each use; except that, where
117 agricultural and horticultural property, as defined in this


118 section, also contains a dwelling unit or units, the farm
119 dwelling, appurtenant residential-related structures and up
120 to five acres immediately surrounding such farm dwelling
121 shall be residential property, as defined in this section,
122 provided that the portion of property used or held for use
123 as an urban and community garden shall not be residential
124 property. This subsection shall not apply to any reliever
125 airport.
126 5. All real property which is vacant, unused, or held
127 for future use; which is used for a private club, a not-for-
128 profit or other nonexempt lodge, club, business, trade,
129 service organization, or similar entity; or for which a
130 determination as to its classification cannot be made under
131 the definitions set out in subsection 1 of this section,
132 shall be classified according to its immediate most suitable
133 economic use, which use shall be determined after
134 consideration of:
135 (1) Immediate prior use, if any, of such property;
136 (2) Location of such property;
137 (3) Zoning classification of such property; except
138 that, such zoning classification shall not be considered
139 conclusive if, upon consideration of all factors, it is
140 determined that such zoning classification does not reflect
141 the immediate most suitable economic use of the property;
142 (4) Other legal restrictions on the use of such
143 property;
144 (5) Availability of water, electricity, gas, sewers,
145 street lighting, and other public services for such property;
146 (6) Size of such property;
147 (7) Access of such property to public thoroughfares;
148 and
149 (8) Any other factors relevant to a determination of
150 the immediate most suitable economic use of such property.


151 6. All lands classified as forest croplands shall not,
152 for taxation purposes, be classified as subclass (1),
153 subclass (2), or subclass (3) real property, as such classes
154 are prescribed in Section 4(b) of Article X of the Missouri
155 Constitution and defined in this section, but shall be taxed
156 in accordance with the laws enacted to implement Section 7
157 of Article X of the Missouri Constitution.